Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7101 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Administrative support” means tasks performed to assist a


licensed mental health professional in the delivery of therapy or

Req. No. 3028 Page 1


psychotherapy services that do not involve therapeutic


communication. Administrative support includes, but is not limited


to, managing appointment scheduling and reminders, processing


billing and insurance claims, and drafting general communications


related to therapy logistics that do not include therapeutic advice;


2. “Artificial intelligence” means a machine-based system that,


for explicit or implicit objectives, infers, from the input it


receives, how to generate outputs such as predictions, content,


recommendations, or decisions that can influence physical or virtual


environments;


3. a. “Consent” means a clear, explicit affirmative act by


an individual that:


(1) unambiguously communicates the individual’s


express, freely given, informed, voluntary,


specific, and unambiguous written agreement,


including a written agreement provided by


electronic means, and


(2) is revocable by the individual.


b. Consent does not include an agreement that is obtained


by the following:


(1) the acceptance of a general or broad terms of use


agreement or a similar document that contains


descriptions of artificial intelligence along


with other unrelated information,

Req. No. 3028 Page 2


(2) an individual hovering over, muting, pausing, or


closing a given piece of digital content, or


(3) an agreement obtained through the use of


deceptive actions;


4. “Health care services” means services included in, or


incidental to, furnishing to an individual:


a. medical, dental, or optometric care or


hospitalization, or


b. other services for the purpose of preventing,


alleviating, curing, or healing a physical illness or


injury;


5. “Licensed health care provider” means a person who is


licensed, certified, or registered by this state to provide health


care services or a medical group, independent practice association,


or professional corporation providing health care services;


6. “Licensed mental health professional” has the same meaning


as provided by Section 1-103 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


7. “Supplementary support” means tasks performed to assist a


licensed mental health professional in the delivery of therapy or


psychotherapy services that do not involve therapeutic communication


and that are not administrative support. Supplementary support


includes, but is not limited to, preparing and maintaining client


records, including therapy notes; analyzing anonymized data to track


client progress or identify trends, subject to review by a licensed

Req. No. 3028 Page 3


mental health professional; and identifying and organizing external


resources or referrals for client use;


8. “Therapeutic communication” means any verbal, nonverbal, or


written interaction conducted in a clinical or professional setting


that is intended to diagnose, treat, or address an individual’s


mental, emotional, or behavioral health concerns. Therapeutic


communication includes, but is not limited to:


a. interacting directly with clients for the purpose of


understanding or reflecting their thoughts, emotions,


or experiences,


b. providing guidance, therapeutic strategies, or


interventions designed to achieve mental health


outcomes,


c. offering emotional support, reassurance, or empathy in


response to psychological or emotional distress,


d. collaborating with clients to develop or modify


therapeutic goals or treatment plans, and


e. offering behavioral feedback intended to promote


psychological growth or address mental health


conditions; and


9. “Therapy or psychotherapy services” means services provided


to diagnose, treat, or improve an individual’s mental health or


behavioral health.



Req. No. 3028 Page 4


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7102 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A licensed mental health professional shall not use


artificial intelligence to assist in providing supplementary support


in therapy or psychotherapy where the client’s therapeutic session


is recorded or transcribed unless:


1. The patient or the patient’s legally authorized


representative is informed in writing of the following:


a. that artificial intelligence will be used, and


b. the specific purpose of the artificial intelligence


tool or system that will be used; and


2. The patient or the patient’s legally authorized


representative provides consent to the use of artificial


intelligence.


B. A licensed mental health professional may use artificial


intelligence tools or systems to assist in providing administrative


support or supplementary support in therapy or psychotherapy


services if the licensed mental health professional maintains full


responsibility for all interactions, outputs, and data use


associated with the system and satisfies the requirements of


subsection A of this section. A licensed mental health professional


shall not allow artificial intelligence to do any of the following:


1. Make independent therapeutic decisions;

Req. No. 3028 Page 5


2. Directly interact with clients in any form of therapeutic


communication;


3. Generate therapeutic recommendations or treatment plans


without review by the licensed mental health professional; or


4. Detect emotions or mental states.


C. A licensed mental health provider, not artificial


intelligence or similar systems, shall make final decisions in the


provision of therapy or psychotherapy services.


D. A licensed mental health professional found in violation of


this section shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedures


Act and the provisions of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, be


subject to disciplinary action by the appropriate licensure board


including, but not limited to, a fine in an amount not to exceed Ten


Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per violation, as determined by the


licensure board, with penalties assessed based on the degree of harm


and the circumstances of the violation.


E. 1. An individual, corporation, or entity shall not provide,


advertise, or otherwise offer therapy or psychotherapy services


through the use of Internet-based artificial intelligence to the


public in this state unless the therapy or psychotherapy services


are conducted by an individual who is a licensed mental health


professional.


2. The Attorney General may investigate actual, alleged, or


suspected violations of paragraph 1 of this subsection and levy

Req. No. 3028 Page 6


administrative fines on any individual, corporation, or entity found


in violation of paragraph 1 of this subsection, in an amount not to


exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation of this


section, and may assess any other penalty or remedy authorized by


law. Administrative fines shall be assessed:


a. based on the degree of harm and the circumstances of


the violation, and


b. after a hearing is held in accordance with the


Administrative Procedures Act.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7103 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A licensed health care provider shall not use artificial


intelligence to assist in the provision of a patient’s care unless:


1. The patient or the patient’s legally authorized


representative is informed in writing of the following:


a. that artificial intelligence will be used, and


b. the specific purpose of the artificial intelligence


tool or system that will be used; and


2. The patient or the patient’s legally authorized


representative provides consent to the use of artificial


intelligence.


B. A licensed health care provider may use artificial


intelligence tools or systems to assist in providing health care

Req. No. 3028 Page 7


services if the licensed health care provider maintains full


responsibility for all interactions, outputs, and data use


associated with the system and satisfies the requirements of


subsection A of this section. A licensed health care provider shall


not allow artificial intelligence to do any of the following:


1. Make independent medical decisions;


2. Directly interact with patients in any form of medical


communication;


3. Diagnose medical conditions; or


4. Generate medical advice or recommendations or treatment


plans without review by the licensed health care provider.


C. A licensed health care provider, not artificial intelligence


or similar systems, shall make final decisions in the provision of


health care services.


D. A licensed health care provider found in violation of this


section shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act


and the provisions of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, be subject


to disciplinary action by the appropriate licensure board including,


but not limited to, a fine in an amount not to exceed Ten Thousand


Dollars ($10,000.00) per violation, as determined by the licensure


board, with penalties assessed based on the degree of harm and the


circumstances of the violation.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 3028 Page 8


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3028 DC 1/15/2026 10:55:23 AM









































Req. No. 3028 Page 9